Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-854
Adulterated commercial feed, defined.

A commercial feed shall be deemed to be adulterated if:

(1)(a) It bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to health, except that if the substance is not an added substance, such commercial feed shall not be considered adulterated under this subdivision if the quantity of such substance in such commercial feed does not ordinarily render it injurious to health;

(b) It bears or contains any added poisonous, deleterious, or nonnutritive substance which is unsafe within the meaning of section 406, as amended, of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, other than one which is (i) a pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity or (ii) a food additive;

(c) It is or it bears or contains any food additive which is unsafe within the meaning of section 409, as amended, of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

(d) It is a raw agricultural commodity and it bears or contains a pesticide chemical which is unsafe within the meaning of section 408(a), as amended, of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, except that when a pesticide chemical has been used in or on a raw agricultural commodity in conformity with an exemption granted or a tolerance prescribed under section 408, as amended, of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and such raw agricultural commodity has been subjected to processing such as canning, cooking, freezing, dehydrating, or milling, the residue of such pesticide chemical remaining in or on such processed feed shall not be deemed unsafe if such residue in or on the raw agricultural commodity has been removed to the extent possible in good manufacturing practice and the concentration of such residue in the processed feed is not greater than the tolerance prescribed for the raw agricultural commodity, unless the feeding of such proposed feed will result or is likely to result in a pesticide residue in the edible product of the animal which is unsafe within the meaning of section 408(a), as amended, of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or

(e) It is or it bears or contains any color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of section 706, as amended, of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

(2) Any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part omitted or abstracted therefrom or any less valuable substance substituted therefor;

(3) Its composition or quality falls below or differs from that which it is purported or is represented to possess by its labeling;

(4) It contains a drug and the methods used in or the facilities or controls used for its manufacture, processing, or packaging do not conform to current good manufacturing practice rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the director to assure that the drug meets the requirements of the Commercial Feed Act as to safety and has the identity and strength and meets the quality and purity characteristics which it purports or is represented to possess. In adopting and promulgating such rules and regulations, the director shall adopt and promulgate the current federal Good Manufacturing Practice Regulations for medicated feed premixes and for medicated feeds established under authority of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act unless he or she determines that they are not appropriate to the conditions which exist in this state;

(5) It contains primary noxious weed seeds as defined in section 81-2,147.01;

(6) It contains prohibited noxious weed seeds as defined in section 81-2,147.01 in amounts exceeding the limits which the director shall establish by rule or regulation; or

(7) It has been manufactured, ground, mixed, bagged, or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth or been rendered injurious to animal health. An animal feed may be deemed to be contaminated with filth if not protected by all reasonable means and as far as necessary from dust, dirt, insect, or bird, rodent, or other animal excretion, and other foreign or injurious contamination.

Laws 1986, LB 322, § 8;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 16;

Laws 1997, LB 263, § 1.